Utah statutes.
73-10-30.   Construction in conjunction with Water Resources Construction Fund -- Supplemental financing.

(1)  Projects authorized under this chapter may be constructed in participation with moneys from the Water Resources Construction Fund when authorized by the board.

(2)  Projects specified by the Legislature to be financed by general obligation bonds of the state may receive supplemental financing from the Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund when needed and moneys are available.

